California, session 20252026, AB2055.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 267 is added to the Harbors and Navigation Code, to read:267. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a peace officer who has successfully completed a course or courses of instruction, approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, in the investigation of vessel accidents may prepare, in triplicate, on a form approved by the Judicial Council, a written notice to appear when the peace officer has reasonable cause to believe that any person involved in a vessel accident has violated a provision of this code not declared to be a felony or a local ordinance and the violation was a factor in the occurrence of the vessel accident.(b) A notice to appear shall contain the name and address of the person, the registration number of the person’s vessel, if any, the name and address, when available, of the registered owner or lessee of the vessel, the offense charged, and the time and place when and where the person may appear in court or before a person authorized to receive a deposit of bail. The time specified shall be at least 10 days after the notice to appear is delivered.(c) The preparation and delivery of a notice to appear pursuant to this section is not an arrest.(d) For purposes of this section, a peace officer has reasonable cause to issue a written notice to appear if, as a result of the officer’s investigation, the officer has evidence, either testimonial or real, or a combination of testimonial and real, that would be sufficient to issue a written notice to appear if the officer had personally witnessed the events investigated.(e) As used in this section, “peace officer” means any person specified under Section 830.1 or 830.2 of the Penal Code, or any reserve police officer or reserve deputy sheriff listed in Section 830.6 of the Penal Code, with the exception of members of the California National Guard.(f) A written notice to appear prepared on a form approved by the Judicial Council and issued pursuant to this section shall be accepted by any court.SEC. 2. Section 658.7 of the Harbors and Navigation Code is amended to read:658.7. (a) Failure of the operator of a vessel involved in towing a skier to display or cause to be displayed a ski flag, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 7009 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, to indicate any of the following conditions, is an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding fifteen dollars ($15):(1) A downed skier.(2) A skier in the water preparing to ski.(3) A ski line extended from the vessel.(4) A ski in the water in the vicinity of the vessel.(b) Failure of the operator of a vessel to display or cause to be displayed a ski flag, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 7009 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, to indicate a swimmer in the vicinity of the vessel is an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding fifteen dollars ($15).(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to a performer engaged in a professional exhibition or a person engaged in a regatta, vessel or water ski race or competition, or other marine event authorized pursuant to Section 268.SEC. 3. Section 760 of the Harbors and Navigation Code is amended to read:760. As used in this article, “for-hire vessel” includes any vessel propelled by machinery carrying one or more passengers for hire, except the following:(a) A sea plane on the water.(b) A watercraft specifically designed to operate on a permanently fixed course, the movement of which is restricted to or guided on such permanently fixed course by means of a mechanical device on a fixed track or arm to which the watercraft is attached or by which the watercraft is controlled, or by means of a mechanical device attached to the watercraft itself.SEC. 4. Section 9850 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:9850.(a)To the extent permissible under federal law, every vessel using the water or on the waters of this state shall be registered pursuant to this chapter.(b)9850. (a) Every undocumented vessel using the waters or on the waters of this state shall be currently numbered. A person shall not operate, and a county, city, or political subdivision shall not give permission for the operation of, an undocumented vessel on those waters unless the undocumented vessel is numbered in accordance with this chapter, an applicable federal law, or a federally approved numbering system of another state, and unless both of the following are met:(1) The certificate of number issued to such undocumented vessel is in full force and effect.(2) The identifying number set forth in the certificate of number is displayed on each side of the bow of the undocumented vessel for which the identifying number was issued.(b) (1) On and after July 1, 2027, and to the extent permissible under federal law, every vessel using the water or on the waters of this state shall be registered pursuant to this chapter.(2) (A) The owner of a vessel that is required to or that has a valid marine document issued by a federal agency and that is registered pursuant to paragraph (1) shall obtain from the department a registration sticker and shall display the single registration sticker on the vessel, either within 18 inches of the normal boarding area or on the mast. The registration sticker shall be visible regardless of whether doors and hatches are open or closed.(B) The department shall not issue a registration sticker to an owner of a vessel described in subparagraph (A) that is larger than a registration sticker issued to an undocumented vessel.SEC. 5. Section 9851 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:9851. The department may adopt rules and regulations for the registration of a vessel belonging to the state, a local public agency, or to the United States without payment of fees specified in this code, except fees for duplicate certificates of ownership, duplicate certificates of number, or substitute current year registration stickers. A vessel owned by the Department Division of Boating and Waterways is exempt from any fees specified in this division.SEC. 6. Section 23640 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:23640. (a) In any case in which a person is charged with a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, or subdivisions (b) to (f), inclusive, of Section 655 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, before acquittal or conviction, the court shall neither suspend nor stay the proceedings for the purpose of allowing the accused person to attend or participate, nor shall the court consider dismissal of or entertain a motion to dismiss the proceedings because the accused person attends or participates during that suspension, in any one or more education, training, or treatment programs, including, but not limited to, a driver improvement program, a treatment program for persons who are habitual users of alcohol or other alcoholism program, a program designed to offer alcohol services to problem drinkers, an alcohol or drug education program, or a treatment program for persons who are habitual users of drugs or other drug-related program.(b) This section shall not apply to any attendance or participation in any education, training, or treatment programs after conviction and sentencing, including attendance or participation in any of those programs as a condition of probation granted after conviction when permitted.SEC. 7. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.